Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0334.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
TITLE
An act to provide for the creation of create the commission on
law enforcement standards; to prescribe its membership, powers, and
duties; to prescribe the reporting responsibilities and other
duties of certain state and local agencies; to require licensing of
and certain training for law enforcement officers; to provide for
additional costs in criminal cases; to provide for the
establishment of the law enforcement officers training fund; and to
LEP S01206'25 (S-1) b6n0cy


provide for disbursement of allocations from the law enforcement
officers training fund to local agencies of government
participating in a police training program.
Sec. 9f. (1) Beginning July 1, 2026, an individual who is
seeking to become licensed as a law enforcement officer under
section 9, 9b, 9c, or 9d shall complete training that meets the
standards under this section. A law enforcement officer who is
licensed under section 9, 9b, 9c, or 9d on July 1, 2026 and who has
not previously completed the training under this section shall
complete training that meets the standards under this section by
July 1, 2027.
(2) Subject to subsection (4), not later than October 1, 2025,
the commission shall conduct or contract for research and analysis
to identify training gaps and begin to adapt, adopt, or develop
curriculum standards for training in the following areas or other
areas the commission determines to be substantially similar:
(a) De-escalation techniques.
(b) Implicit bias training.
(c) Procedural justice training.
(d) Behavioral health resources and support available for law
enforcement officers.
(e) Crisis intervention techniques.
(3) The curriculum standards for training on de-escalation
techniques must include all of the following:
(a) The employment of verbal and physical tactics to defuse
volatile or potentially violent situations, including when the use
of the tactics is safe and feasible, with an emphasis on using
communication, negotiation, and de-escalation techniques.
(b) The level of force that is an objectively reasonable
LEP S01206'25 (S-1) b6n0cy


response to an identified and articulable threat or resistance that
is based on information available at the time of the incident and
that requires constant reevaluation as circumstances dictate and
allow.
(c) Training that provides law enforcement officers with
awareness and recognition of indicators of physical disabilities,
intellectual disabilities, developmental disabilities, mental
health disorders, and substance use disorders with an emphasis on
effective communication and de-escalation techniques.
(d) As appropriate with the nature and immediacy of the threat
to public safety, the use of distance, cover, and time when
approaching and managing critical incidents, in order to help
create a safety zone between the law enforcement officer and
subject, to afford the law enforcement officer more time to react
to the circumstances.
(e) A law enforcement officer's responsibility to intervene in
a situation if another law enforcement officer's actions indicate
that the other law enforcement officer has lost self-control or use
of force is not objectively reasonable to the level of resistance
encountered.
(f) Methods to divert individuals with intellectual
disabilities, developmental disabilities, mental health disorders,
or substance use disorders from involvement in the criminal justice
system.
(g) Information about this state's behavioral health system,
including, but not limited to, its history and resources.
(h) Other evidence-based approaches, found to be appropriate
by the commission, that enhance de-escalation techniques and
skills.
LEP S01206'25 (S-1) b6n0cy


(4) An individual seeking to become a law enforcement officer
licensed under this act or an individual who is already a licensed
law enforcement officer under this act may meet the standards for
implicit bias training required under subsection (2)(b) by
completing an implicit bias training course approved by the
commission.
(5) Not more than 6 months after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section, each law enforcement agency
in this state shall adopt a written policy that states that each of
the law enforcement officers in its employ shall utilize de-
escalation techniques in the law enforcement officer's interactions
with citizens to the extent that is reasonable and as safe as
possible.
(6) The commission shall make a model written policy that
meets the requirements of this section available on its website. A
law enforcement agency may fulfill its duty under subsection (5) by
adopting the written policy made available under this subsection.
(7) The commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to
24.328, to ensure compliance with this section, including a tiered
system of license sanctions up to license revocation for a law
enforcement officer licensed under section 9, 9b, 9c, or 9d who
refuses to comply with the training requirements under this
section. The rules promulgated under this subsection pertaining to
the revocation of a license must incorporate the requirements and
procedures in the same manner as provided in sections 9(13),
9b(13), 9c(12), and 9d(14).
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Behavioral health" means the treatment of a mental
LEP S01206'25 (S-1) b6n0cy


disability, mental health disorder, or substance use disorder, and
the support of an individual who experiences or is in recovery from
a mental disability, mental health disorder, or substance use
disorder.
(b) "Crisis intervention technique" means a method of
immediate response to an individual or a situation involving an
individual experiencing a crisis that includes, but is not limited
to, any of the following:
(i) Mental disability.
(ii) Mental health disorder.
(iii) Substance use disorder.
(iv) Acute emotional distress.
(c) "Curriculum" means a structure of educational standards
that identifies behavioral objectives and outcomes.
(d) "De-escalation technique" means a method or methods
intended to defuse a potentially volatile or violent situation with
the goal to reduce the level of subject control required to resolve
the situation in an objectively reasonable and safe manner.
(e) "Implicit bias training" means evidence-based training
that provides instruction regarding the bias implicit in all human
beings and how to help ensure subconscious bias does not inhibit
fair and impartial law enforcement.
(f) "Procedural justice training" means training based on the
principles of treating people with dignity and respect, giving
citizens a voice during encounters, being neutral in decision
making, and conveying trustworthy motives while emphasizing law
enforcement's role in the context of the larger criminal justice
system.
(g) "Training gap" means identified behavioral or performance
LEP S01206'25 (S-1) b6n0cy


deficiencies caused by a lack of skill or knowledge.
Sec. 9g. (1) A law enforcement officer licensed under this act
shall complete not less than 12 hours of continuing education in
the areas listed under section 9f(2)(a) to (e) on or after July 1,
2027 and before July 1, 2028.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2028, a law enforcement officer licensed
under this act shall complete not less than 24 hours of continuing
education every 2 years in the areas listed under section 9f(2)(a)
to (e).
(3) The commission shall promulgate rules to implement this
section pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969
PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.
Final Page
LEP S01206'25 (S-1) b6n0cy